Georgia, session 2025_26, HB25.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Dignity is Essential Act."
SECTION 2.
Article 1 of Chapter 4 of Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
public assistance generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
H. B. 25
- 1 -

LC 60 0033
"49-4-23.
If the United States Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition Service creates and
makes available to the states a waiver permitting recipients of benefits provided under the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program or the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program
for Women, Infants, and Children to use their benefits to purchase diapers or menstrual
hygiene products, such as tampons, sanitary napkins, and feminine wipes, then the
Department of Human Services shall apply for such waiver. If the United States
Department of Agriculture approves such waiver application, then the Department of
Human Services shall adopt rules and make other changes as necessary to implement the
approved waiver."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 25
- 2 -